Utah statutes.
26-40-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Child" means a person who is under 19 years of age.

(2)  "Eligible child" means a child who qualifies for enrollment in the program as provided in Section 26-40-105.

(3)  "Enrollee" means any child enrolled in the program.

(4)  "Plan" means the department's plan submitted to the United States Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397ff.

(5)  "Program" means the Utah Children's Health Insurance Program created by this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 1, 2000 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 351, 2000 General Session

